Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-904
Governing body; powers.

Authority is hereby conferred upon the governing body of any political subdivision to consider, ascertain, adjust, compromise, settle, determine, and allow any tort claim as defined in the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act and sections 16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610.

Laws 1969, c. 138, § 3, p. 628;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2403;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1020.